New Jersey, session 222, S563.
Be It Enacted by the Senate and General Assembly of the State of New Jersey: 1.    a.  Receipts from sales of reusable carryout bags are exempt from the tax imposed under the Sales and Use Tax Act, P.L.1966, c.30 (C.54:32B-1 et seq.). b.    As used in this section, reusable carryout bag means a carryout bag that: (1) is made of polypropylene, PET nonwoven fabric, nylon, cloth, hemp product, or other machine washable fabric; (2) has stitched handles; and (3) is designed and manufactured for multiple reuse. 2.    This act shall take effect immediately and shall apply to the receipts received from all sales made on or after the first day of the fourth month next following enactment.